New York, session 2025-2026, A10722.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 14 of chapter 460 of the 2 laws of 2021 amending the vehicle and traffic law, the general municipal 3 law and the public officers law relating to certain traffic infractions 4 and notices of liability and amending the vehicle and traffic law relat- 5 ing to adjudications and owner liability for a violation of traffic-con- 6 trol signal indications in the village of Pelham Manor, is amended to 7 read as follows: 8 This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 9 sections eleven, twelve and thirteen of this act shall take effect on 10 the thirtieth day after such sections shall have become a law and shall 11 expire [on] December 1, [2026] 2031, when upon such date the provisions 12 of such sections shall be deemed repealed; provided, further, that any 13 such local law as may be enacted pursuant to section eleven of this act 14 shall remain in full force and effect only until December 1, [2026] 15 2031; provided, further, that effective immediately, the addition, 16 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 17 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 18 made and completed on or before such effective date; and provided 19 further, that: 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15282-01-6